District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-302.03

Duties of Director.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 203, 32 DCR 7396
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(h), 44 DCR 1423
Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-169, § 3, 47 DCR 5846
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1182.3.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, or Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-216, April 3, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3458).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 3 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, or Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-415, August 14, 2000, 47 DCR 7296).